New.aff
#FLAG long
SET UTF8
TRY abcdefghijklmnoprstuvwyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPRSTUVWYZ

# Key principle: Never mix tense flags
# In your .dic file, create separate entries:
# lya/[present tense flag][other flags]      # Present tense: produces "bagulya", "gubalya", etc.
# lya/[past tense flag][other flags]        # Near past tense: produces "baagulya", "gubalya", etc.
# This prevents "babaagulya" from being generated because tense flags will never combine on the same word.

# Lets first apply the 1st, 2nd and 3rd person prefixes both singular and plural
# Commented this out and combined them with subject markers
# PFX A Y 6
# PFX A 0 n .
# PFX A 0 o .
# PFX A 0 a .
# PFX A 0 tu .
# PFX A 0 mu .
# PFX A 0 ba .

# Reflexive verb form, subject markers in present tense
PFX B Y 35
PFX B 0 nee .
PFX B 0 wee .
PFX B 0 yee .
PFX B 0 twe .
PFX B 0 mwe .
PFX B 0 bee .
PFX B 0 abee .
PFX B 0 gwe .
PFX B 0 ogwe .
PFX B 0 gye .
PFX B 0 egye .
PFX B 0 zee .
PFX B 0 ezee .
PFX B 0 kye .
PFX B 0 ekye .
PFX B 0 bye .
PFX B 0 ebye .
PFX B 0 lye .
PFX B 0 elye .
PFX B 0 gee .
PFX B 0 agee .
PFX B 0 kee .
PFX B 0 akee .
PFX B 0 bwe .
PFX B 0 obwe .
PFX B 0 lwe .
PFX B 0 olwe .
PFX B 0 zee .
PFX B 0 ezee .
PFX B 0 kwe .
PFX B 0 okwe .
PFX B 0 gee .
PFX B 0 agee .
PFX B 0 twe .
PFX B 0 otwe .

# present and very near past tense negative subject marker
PFX C Y 33  
PFX C 0 si .
PFX C 0 to .
PFX C 0 ta .
PFX C 0 tetu .
PFX C 0 temu .
PFX C 0 teba .
PFX C 0 abata .
PFX C 0 tegu .
PFX C 0 oguta .
PFX C 0 tegi .
PFX C 0 egita .
PFX C 0 te .
PFX C 0 ete .
PFX C 0 tezi .
PFX C 0 ezita .
PFX C 0 teki .
PFX C 0 ekita .
PFX C 0 tebi .
PFX C 0 ebita .
PFX C 0 teli .
PFX C 0 elita .
PFX C 0 tega .
PFX C 0 agata .
PFX C 0 teka .
PFX C 0 akata .
PFX C 0 tebu .
PFX C 0 obuta .
PFX C 0 telu .
PFX C 0 oluta .
PFX C 0 teku .
PFX C 0 okuta .
PFX C 0 tetu .
PFX C 0 otuta .

# Near and distant past tense negative subject marker
PFX a Y 33  
PFX a 0 saa .
PFX a 0 tewa .
PFX a 0 teya .
PFX a 0 tetwa .
PFX a 0 temwa .
PFX a 0 tebaa .
PFX a 0 abataa .
PFX a 0 tegwa .
PFX a 0 ogutaa .
PFX a 0 tegya .
PFX a 0 egitaa .
PFX a 0 teya .
PFX a 0 etee .
PFX a 0 tezaa .
PFX a 0 ezita .
PFX a 0 tekya .
PFX a 0 ekitaa .
PFX a 0 tebya .
PFX a 0 ebitaa .
PFX a 0 telya .
PFX a 0 elitaa .
PFX a 0 tegaa .
PFX a 0 agataa .
PFX a 0 tekaa .
PFX a 0 akataa .
PFX a 0 tebwa .
PFX a 0 obutaa .
PFX a 0 telwa .
PFX a 0 olutaa .
PFX a 0 tekwa .
PFX a 0 okutaa .
PFX a 0 tetwa .
PFX a 0 otutaa .

# Negative Subject markers for the near future 
# I think they can be used in questions e.g temuuwe? temuulye?
PFX b Y 37
PFX b 0 sii .
PFX b 0 temuu .
PFX b 0 too .
PFX b 0 taa .
PFX b 0 tetuu .
PFX b 0 temuu .
PFX b 0 tebaa .
PFX b 0 abataa .
PFX b 0 teguu .
PFX b 0 ogutaa .
PFX b 0 tegii .
PFX b 0 egitaa .
PFX b 0 tee .
PFX b 0 tezii .
PFX b 0 ezitaa .
PFX b 0 tekii .
PFX b 0 ekitaa .
PFX b 0 tebii .
PFX b 0 ebitaa .
PFX b 0 telii .
PFX b 0 elitaa .
PFX b 0 tegaa .
PFX b 0 agataa .
PFX b 0 tekaa .
PFX b 0 akataa .
PFX b 0 tebuu .
PFX b 0 obutaa .
PFX b 0 teluu .
PFX b 0 olutaa .
PFX b 0 tezii .
PFX b 0 ezitaa .
PFX b 0 tekuu .
PFX b 0 okutaa .
PFX b 0 teguu .
PFX b 0 ogutaa .
PFX b 0 tetuu .
PFX b 0 otutaa .

# Negative Subject markers for the far future tense
PFX c Y 39
PFX c 0 sili
PFX c 0 toli .
PFX c 0 tali .
PFX c 0 tetuli .
PFX c 0 temuli .
PFX c 0 tebali .
PFX c 0 abatali .
PFX c 0 atali .
PFX c 0 tebali .
PFX c 0 abatali .
PFX c 0 teguli .
PFX c 0 ogutali .
PFX c 0 tegili .
PFX c 0 egitali .
PFX c 0 teli .
PFX c 0 tezili .
PFX c 0 ezitali .
PFX c 0 tekili .
PFX c 0 ekitali .
PFX c 0 tebili .
PFX c 0 ebitali .
PFX c 0 telili .
PFX c 0 elitali .
PFX c 0 tegali .
PFX c 0 agatali .
PFX c 0 tekali .
PFX c 0 akatali .
PFX c 0 tebuli .
PFX c 0 obutali .
PFX c 0 teluli .
PFX c 0 olutali .
PFX c 0 tezili .
PFX c 0 ezitali .
PFX c 0 tekuli .
PFX c 0 okutali .
PFX c 0 tegali .
PFX c 0 agatali .
PFX c 0 tetuli .
PFX c 0 otutali .

# Reflexive verb form, subject markers in the near future tense
PFX d Y 34
PFX d 0 nne .
PFX d 0 onee .
PFX d 0 anee .
PFX d 0 tunee .
PFX d 0 munee .
PFX d 0 banee .
PFX d 0 gunee .
PFX d 0 ogunee .
PFX d 0 ginee .
PFX d 0 eginee .
PFX d 0 zinee .
PFX d 0 ezinee .
PFX d 0 kinee .
PFX d 0 ekinee .
PFX d 0 binee .
PFX d 0 ebinee .
PFX d 0 linee .
PFX d 0 elinee .
PFX d 0 ganee .
PFX d 0 aganee .
PFX d 0 kanee .
PFX d 0 akanee .
PFX d 0 bunee .
PFX d 0 obunee .
PFX d 0 lunee .
PFX d 0 olunee .
PFX d 0 zinee .
PFX d 0 ezinee .
PFX d 0 kunee .
PFX d 0 okunee .
PFX d 0 ganee .
PFX d 0 aganee .
PFX d 0 tunee .
PFX d 0 otunee .

# Reflexive verb form, subject markers in the far future tense
PFX e Y 34
PFX e 0 ndye .
PFX e 0 olye .
PFX e 0 alye .
PFX e 0 tulye .
PFX e 0 mulye .
PFX e 0 balye .
PFX e 0 abalye .
PFX e 0 gulye .
PFX e 0 ogulye .
PFX e 0 gilye .
PFX e 0 egilye .
PFX e 0 zilye .
PFX e 0 ezilye .
PFX e 0 kilye .
PFX e 0 ekilye .
PFX e 0 bilye .
PFX e 0 ebilye .
PFX e 0 lilye .
PFX e 0 elilye .
PFX e 0 galye .
PFX e 0 agalye .
PFX e 0 kalye .
PFX e 0 akalye .
PFX e 0 bulye .
PFX e 0 obulye .
PFX e 0 lulye .
PFX e 0 olulye .
PFX e 0 zilye .
PFX e 0 ezilye .
PFX e 0 kulye .
PFX e 0 okulye .
PFX e 0 galye .
PFX e 0 agalye .
PFX e 0 tulye .
PFX e 0 otulye .

# Negating the reflexive verb form
PFX D Y 20
PFX D 0 see .
PFX D 0 tewee .
PFX D 0 teyee .
PFX D 0 tetwe .
PFX D 0 temwe .
PFX D 0 tebee .
PFX D 0 tegwe .
PFX D 0 tegye .
PFX D 0 tezee .
PFX D 0 tekye .
PFX D 0 tebye .
PFX D 0 telye .
PFX D 0 tegee .
PFX D 0 tekee .
PFX D 0 tebwe .
PFX D 0 telwe .
PFX D 0 tezee .
PFX D 0 tekwe .
PFX D 0 tegee .
PFX D 0 tetwe .

# subjects markers in present and very near past tense 
PFX E Y 37
PFX E j n jj # It handles the word "nja" 
PFX E 0 n [^jbnmlhprxq] # Person marker
PFX E 0 m [b] # Person marker
PFX E 0 o . # Person marker
PFX E l nd [l] # Person marker
PFX E 0 a . # Person marker
PFX E 0 tu . # Person marker
PFX E 0 mu . # Person marker
PFX E 0 ba . # Person marker
PFX E 0 a [^aeiou]
PFX E 0 ba .
PFX E 0 aba .
PFX E 0 gu .
PFX E 0 ogu .
PFX E 0 gi .
PFX E 0 egi .
PFX E 0 e [^aeiou]
PFX E 0 zi .
PFX E 0 ezi .
PFX E 0 ki .
PFX E 0 eki .
PFX E 0 bi .
PFX E 0 ebi .
PFX E 0 li .
PFX E 0 eli .
PFX E 0 ga .
PFX E 0 aga .
PFX E 0 ka .
PFX E 0 aka .
PFX E 0 bu .
PFX E 0 obu .
PFX E 0 lu .
PFX E 0 olu .
PFX E 0 ku .
PFX E 0 oku .
PFX E 0 tu .
PFX E 0 otu .

# subject markers in near past tense
PFX G Y 34
PFX G 0 nna .
PFX G 0 wa .
PFX G 0 ya .
PFX G 0 eya .
PFX G 0 twa .
PFX G 0 mwa .
PFX G 0 baa .
PFX G 0 abaa .
PFX G 0 gwa .
PFX G 0 ogwa .
PFX G 0 gya .
PFX G 0 egya .
PFX G 0 zaa .
PFX G 0 ezaa .
PFX G 0 kyaa .
PFX G 0 ekyaa .
PFX G 0 byaa .
PFX G 0 ebyaa .
PFX G 0 lyaa .
PFX G 0 elyaa .
PFX G 0 gaa .
PFX G 0 agaa .
PFX G 0 kaa .
PFX G 0 akaa .
PFX G 0 bwa .
PFX G 0 obwa .
PFX G 0 lwa .
PFX G 0 olwa .
PFX G 0 kwaa .
PFX G 0 okwaa .
PFX G 0 gaa .
PFX G 0 agaa .
PFX G 0 twaa .
PFX G 0 otwaa .

# subject markers for the distant past tense
PFX J Y 36 
PFX J 0 nn .
PFX J 0 wa .
PFX J 0 ya .
PFX J 0 eya .
PFX J 0 twa .
PFX J 0 mwa .
PFX J 0 baa .
PFX J 0 abaa .
PFX J 0 gwa .
PFX J 0 ogwa .
PFX J 0 gya .
PFX J 0 egya .
PFX J 0 zaa .
PFX J 0 ezaa .
PFX J 0 kya .
PFX J 0 ekya .
PFX J 0 bya .
PFX J 0 ebya .
PFX J 0 lya .
PFX J 0 elya .
PFX J 0 gaa .
PFX J 0 ogwa .
PFX J 0 kaa .
PFX J 0 akaa .
PFX J 0 bwa .
PFX J 0 obwa .
PFX J 0 lwaa .
PFX J 0 olwaa .
PFX J 0 zaa .
PFX J 0 ezaa .
PFX J 0 kwaa .
PFX J 0 okwaa .
PFX J 0 gaa .
PFX J 0 agaa .
PFX J 0 twa .
PFX J 0 otwa .
